Washington statutes.
RCW 32.50.050

Request for review of actions taken by representative or conservator.

During the period of the supervisory direction and during the period of conservatorship, the savings bank may request the director to review an action taken or proposed to be taken by the representative or conservator; specifying wherein the action complained of is believed not to be in the best interest of the savings bank, and such request shall stay the action specified pending review of such action by the director. Any order entered by the director appointing a representative and providing that the savings bank shall not do certain acts as provided in RCW 32.50.020 and 32.50.030, any order entered by the director appointing a conservator, and any order by the director following the review of an action of the representative or conservator under this section shall be subject to review in accordance with the administrative procedure act of the state of Washington.

[ 2010 c 88 s 70.]